North Carolina statutes. Chapter 18B. Regulation of Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 10. Retail Activity.
§ 18B-1006.
Miscellaneous provisions on permits.

School and College Campuses. — No permit for the sale of alcoholic beverages shall be issued to a business on the campus or property of a public school, college, or university. This subsection shall not apply to the following:

A regional facility as defined by

G.S. 160A-480.2

operated by a facility authority under Part 4 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes.

Property owned by a local board of education and leased for 99 years or more to a nonprofit auditorium authority created prior to 1991 whose governing board is appointed by a city governing board, a county board of commissioners, or a local school board.

A hotel.

A nonprofit alumni organization.

Restaurants, eating establishments, food businesses, or retail businesses on the property defined by

G.S. 116-198.33(4)

.

Any golf courses owned or leased by the public college or university and open to the public for use.

The sale of malt beverages, unfortified wine, or fortified wine at the following:

Performing arts centers located on property owned or leased by the public college or university.

Any stadiums that support a NASCAR-sanctioned one-fourth mile asphalt flat oval short track, that are owned or leased by the public college or university.

Special one-time permits as described in G.S. 18B-1002(a)(5) for the Loudermilk Center for Excellence facility at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.

Special one-time permits described in G.S. 18B-1002(a)(6).

Is within 500 feet of the furthest exterior building wall, perimeter fence, or permanent fixed perimeter.

Is designated by the stadium, athletic facility, or arena in a map or written description that clearly defines the boundary of the area, and that map or written description is included in the permit application.

Can be designated in a manner that enables the stadium, athletic facility, or arena to ensure compliance with the provisions of this Chapter.

A stadium, athletic facility, or arena on the campus or property of a public college or university, if the Board of Trustees of the public college or university has voted to allow the issuance of permits for use at that stadium, athletic facility, or arena. If a Board of Trustees votes to allow the issuance of permits in accordance with this subdivision, the Board of Trustees shall provide written notice to the Commission that it has voted to allow the issuance of permits. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “public college or university” does not include a community college. Any permit described in

G.S. 18B-1001

, 18B-1002(a)(2), or 18B-1002(a)(5) may be issued pursuant to this subdivision to applicants meeting the requirements for the requested permit. Notwithstanding the issuance of a mixed beverages permit pursuant to

G.S. 18B-1001

(10), this subdivision does not authorize the sale of mixed beverages when the stadium, athletic facility, or arena is being used for a sports event sponsored by the public college or university. This subdivision does not apply to any sales authorized under subdivisions (1) through (8) of this subsection. For purposes of this subdivision, the premises of a stadium, athletic facility, or arena shall include any area that meets all of the following requirements:

Lockers at Clubs. — A private club or congressionally-chartered veterans organization which has been issued a brown-bagging permit may, but is not required to, provide lockers for its members to store their alcoholic beverages. If lockers are provided, however, they shall not be shared but shall be for individual members. Each locker and each bottle of alcoholic beverages on the premises shall be labelled with the name of the member to whom it belongs. No more than eight liters each of malt beverages or unfortified wine may be stored by a member at one time. No more than eight liters of either fortified wine or spirituous liquor, or eight liters of the two combined, may be stored by a member at one time.

Wine Sales. — Holders of retail or wholesale permits for the sale of unfortified or fortified wine may buy and sell only wines on the Commission’s approved list. The Commission may authorize the importation and purchase of wines not on the approved list by permittees and others. An authorization shall state the kind and amount of wine that may be imported and purchased and the time within which the transaction shall be completed.

Unlawful Possession or Consumption. — It shall be unlawful for a permittee to possess or consume, or allow any other person to possess or consume, on the licensed premises, any fortified wine or spirituous liquor, the possession or consumption of which is not authorized either by the permits issued to him for the premises or by any other provision of the ABC law.

Facsimile Permit. — It shall be unlawful for any person to produce or possess any false or facsimile permit, or for a permittee to display any false or facsimile permit on his licensed premises.

Failure to Surrender Permit. — It shall be unlawful for any person to refuse to surrender any permit to the Commission upon lawful demand of the Commission or its agents.

Restrictions on Sales at Cooking Schools. — Retail sales of food or alcoholic beverages to be consumed on the premises of a cooking school are restricted to bona fide enrolled students of that school. Violation of this subsection is a ground for administrative action under

G.S. 18B-104

.

Purchase Restrictions. — A retail permittee may purchase malt beverages, unfortified wine, or fortified wine only from a wholesaler who maintains a place of business in this State and has the proper permit.

Tour Boats. — The Commission may issue permits to boats that conduct regularly scheduled tours upon the rivers or waterways of this State under the following conditions:

A boat shall offer food and non-alcoholic beverages for sale on each tour.

A boat’s gross receipts from sales of alcoholic beverages shall be no more than twenty-five percent (25%) of its total gross receipts.

A boat may hold the permits listed in

G.S. 18B-1001(1)

, (3), (5), (7), and (10), but no off-premises sales may be made pursuant to those permits;

A boat shall have a home port in an area where issuance of any of the permits listed in subdivision (3) is legal, and all passengers shall enter the boat at the home port or at other ports listed on a preannounced itinerary. The boat’s permits are valid during tours that leave and return to the boat’s home port, and apply regardless of whether the boat crosses into an area where sales are not legal, if the boat docks only at a port listed on the preannounced itinerary, except in an emergency; and

A boat conducting tours along the intracoastal waterway and navigable waterways that enters into the intracoastal waterway, pursuant to a preannounced itinerary that includes visits to two or more cities, may serve alcoholic beverages pursuant to ABC permits issued according to the jurisdiction of its home port in the following manner:

While on tour, alcoholic beverages may be served to passengers;

While docked in any other port alcoholic beverages may be served only to tour passengers;

During special city-sponsored events and festivals, in which case the boat may open its galley and bars at dockside to the general public and sell those alcoholic beverages that are lawful in the jurisdiction in which it is docked. Any sales in this manner shall be in accordance with the requirements of any ordinances of the jurisdiction in which the boat is docked.

Liquor purchased for resale in mixed beverages may be purchased only from the local board for the jurisdiction of the boat’s home port.

Recreation Districts. — Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 6 of this Chapter, the Commission may issue permits for the sale of malt beverages, unfortified wine, fortified wine, and mixed beverages to qualified businesses in a recreation district.A “recreation district” is an area that meets any of the following requirements:

An area that is located in a county that has not approved the issuance of permits, has at least two cities that have approved the sale of malt beverages, wine, and the operation of an ABC store, and contains a facility of at least 450 acres where five or more public auto racing events are held each year.

An area that is located in a county that borders a county which has held elections pursuant to G.S. 18B-600(f) and borders on another state and which (i) contains a facility of at least 225 acres where four or more public auto racing events are held each year or (ii) contains a facility of at least 140 acres where 80 or more motor sports events are held each year.

A recreation district includes the area within a half-mile radius of a racing facility that meets the requirements of subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection.

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-203, s. 27, effective August 17, 2004.

Residential Private Club and Sports Club Permits. — The Commission may issue the permits listed in

G.S. 18B-1001

, without approval at an election, to a residential private club or a sports club, except if the sale of mixed beverages is not lawful within a jurisdiction and that locality has voted against the sale of mixed beverages in a referendum conducted on or after September 1, 2001. If the issuance of permits is prohibited by the exception in the previous sentence, the Commission may renew existing permits and may continue to issue permits for a business location that had previously held permits under this subsection. No permit may be issued to any residential private club or sports club that practices discrimination on the basis of race, gender or ethnicity.The mixed beverages purchase-transportation permit authorized by G.S. 18B-404(b) shall be issued by a local board operating a store located in the county.

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-203, s. 65, effective August 17, 2004.

Interstate Interchange Economic Development Zones. —

The Commission may issue permits listed in

G.S. 18B-1001(10)

, without approval at an election, to qualified establishments defined in G.S. 18B-1000(4), (6), and (8) located within one mile of an interstate highway interchange located in a county that:

Has approved the sale of malt beverages, unfortified wine, and fortified wine, but not mixed beverages;

Operates ABC stores;

Borders on another state; and

Lies north and east of the Roanoke River.

The Commission may issue permits listed in

G.S. 18B-1001(1)

, (3), (5), and (10) to qualified establishments defined in G.S. 18B-1000(4), (6), and (8) and may issue permits listed in

G.S. 18B-1001(2)

and (4) to qualified establishments defined in G.S. 18B-1000(3) in any county that qualifies for issuance of permits pursuant to G.S. 18B-1006(k). These permits may be issued without approval at an election and shall be issued only to qualified establishments that meet all of the following requirements:

Located within one mile of any interstate highway interchange in that county;

Located within one mile of an establishment issued a permit under G.S. 18B-1006(k); and

Is, or is located within one-quarter mile of, a hotel with 70 or more rooms.

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-203, s. 28, effective August 17, 2004.

National Historic Landmark District. — The Commission may issue permits listed in

G.S. 18B-1001(10)

, without approval at an election, to qualified establishments defined in G.S. 18B-1000(4) and (6) located within a National Historical Landmark as defined in 16 U.S.C. § 470a(a)(1)(B) located in a county that meets all of the following requirements:

Has approved the sale of malt beverages and unfortified wine but not mixed beverages.

Has at least one city that has approved the operation of an ABC store and the sale of mixed beverages.

Has at least 150,000 population based on the last federal census.

(n1)

State Boundary Certification. —

The Commission may issue permits listed in

G.S. 18B-1001(2)

and (4), without approval at an election, to qualified establishments defined in G.S. 18B-1000(7) that meet all of the following requirements:

(1)

The establishment is located in a county that borders on another state.

(2)

The location of the establishment was reclassified from out-of-state to North Carolina as a result of a State boundary certification.

(3)

The establishment was licensed or permitted by the previous state of record to sell malt beverages and unfortified wine.

(n2)

Event Centers. —

The Commission may issue permits listed in

G.S. 18B-1001(10)

and (12), without approval at an election, to qualified establishments defined in G.S. 18B-1000(4) and (6) that meet all of the following requirements:

(1)

The establishment is located in a county that has more than two man-made lakes.

(2)

The establishment is located in a county that has approved the sale of malt beverages and unfortified wine but not mixed beverages.

(3)

The establishment is open to the public and includes on its premises a hotel with accommodations for 20 or more overnight guests, agritourism activities as defined in

G.S. 99E-30

, and firearm sports.

Expired.

The Commission shall issue a special occasion permit under

G.S. 18B-1001(8)

to a mixed beverage permittee in a sports facility occupied by a major league professional sports team with suites available for sale or lease to patrons of the facility to authorize patrons to make available alcoholic beverages in those suites as if the patron were a host of a reception, party or other special occasion. If the patron occupying the suite so desires, alcoholic beverages by self-service may be made available to any person at least 21 years of age possessing a valid ticket to the event authorizing that person to occupy the suite. At no event may the patron make available a quantity of alcoholic beverages in excess of the amount a person is allowed to buy under G.S. 18B-303(a). A mixed beverage permittee who holds a permit shall provide mixed beverage tax paid spirituous liquor for resale by the container in approved sizes of no larger than 750 milliliters to the host or patron of the suite. This subsection does not authorize any person possessing a valid ticket to an event at the facility to bring alcoholic beverages onto the premises and consume those alcoholic beverages on the premises, or to remove those beverages from the suite.

The hours for sales and consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises of a permittee who meets the requirements of

G.S. 18B-1009

shall be one hour earlier than permitted by G.S. 18B-1004(c).

History.

1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1262, s. 23; 1985, c. 114, s. 2; c. 301; 1987, c. 515; c. 760; 1989, c. 360; c. 770, s. 49; c. 800, s. 18; 1991, c. 340, s. 1; c. 459, s. 7; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 920, s. 12; 1993, c. 415, ss. 17-19; c. 508, s. 6; 1995, c. 224, s. 1; c. 372, s. 2; c. 458, s. 8; c. 466, ss. 11-12; 1997-182, s. 3; 1997-395, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 16.27(a); 1999-462, ss. 2, 10, 12, 14.; 2001-130, ss. 1, 1.4; 2004-199, s. 10; 2004-203, ss. 27, 28, 65; 2005-327, ss. 1, 2, 4; 2006-227, s. 7; 2006-264, s. 100; 2007-323, s. 6.25; 2013-394, s. 5(b); 2013-410, s. 27.9; 2014-120, s. 14; 2016-23, s. 8; 2018-145, s. 13(b); 2019-52, s. 1; 2021-150, ss. 3.1, 31.1.

Local Modification.

Davie: 2001-130, ss. 1.1 to 1.3; Graham: 2001-130, ss. 1.1 to 1.3; Harnett: 2001-130, ss. 1.1 to 1.3; Lincoln: 2001-130, ss. 1.1 to 1.3; McDowell: 2001-130, ss. 1.1 to 1.3; Swain: 2001-130, ss. 1.1 to 1.3; Yancey: 2001-130, ss. 1.1 to 1.3.

§ 18B-1006.1.
Additional requirement for certain permittees to recycle beverage containers.

Holders of on-premises malt beverage permits, on-premises unfortified wine permits, on-premises fortified wine permits, and mixed beverages permits shall separate, store, and provide for the collection for recycling of all recyclable beverage containers of all beverages sold at retail on the premises. A permittee has satisfied the requirements of this section if it implements a recycling program that meets the minimum standards of the model recycling program developed by the Commission pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.14(m). Failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall not be grounds for revocation of a permit. A conviction for violation of this section shall not constitute an alcoholic beverage offense within the meaning of G.S. 18B-900(a)(4).

History.

2005-348, s. 1; 2007-402, s. 2(a); 2008-187, s. 35.5.

§ 18B-1007.
Additional requirements for mixed beverages permittees.

Purchases. — A mixed beverages permittee may purchase spirituous liquor for resale as mixed beverages and a guest room cabinet permittee may purchase spirituous liquor for resale from a guest room cabinet only at an ABC store designated by a local board and only with a purchase-transportation permit issued by that local board under

G.S. 18B-403

and 18B-404.

Handling Bottles. — It shall be unlawful for a mixed beverages permittee or the permittee’s agent or employee to do any of the following:

Store any other spirituous liquor with liquor possessed for resale in mixed beverages or from a guest room cabinet.

Refill any spirituous liquor container having a mixed beverages tax stamp with any other alcoholic beverage, or add to the contents of such a container any other alcoholic beverage.

Transfer from one container to another a mixed beverages tax stamp.

Possess any container of spirituous liquor not bearing a mixed beverages tax stamp, except for containers being brought onto the premises by the host of a private function under a special occasion permit.

Price List. — Each mixed beverages permittee shall have available for its customers the printed prices of the most common or popular mixed beverages offered for sale by the permittee. Violation of this subsection shall not be a criminal offense, but shall be punishable under

G.S. 18B-104

.

When a temporary mixed beverages permit has been issued to a new permittee for the continuation of a business at the same location, the permittee going out of business may sell existing mixed beverages inventory to the new permittee, and the Commission may request that the local ABC board restamp the inventory with the mixed beverages tax stamp assigned by the local board to the new mixed beverages permittee.

History.

1981, c. 412, s. 2; c. 746, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1262, s. 20; 1989, c. 800, s. 15; 1991, c. 565, ss. 6, 7; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 920, s. 8; 1995, c. 466, s. 13.

§ 18B-1008.
Rules concerning retail permits.

The Commission is authorized to use broad discretion in further defining the kinds of places eligible for permits under this Article. The rules may state the kind and amount of food that shall be sold to qualify in each category, the relationship between food sales and other receipts, the size of the establishment required for each category, the kinds of facilities needed to qualify, the kinds of activities at which alcoholic beverages may not be sold, and any other matters which are necessary to determine which businesses are bona fide establishments of the kinds listed in

G.S. 18B-1000

. Rules concerning private clubs may also include requirements that the club have a membership committee to review all applications for membership, that the club charge membership dues substantially greater than what would be paid by a one-time or casual user, that the club restrict use by nonmembers, and that the club provide facilities or activities other than those directly related to the use of alcoholic beverages.

History.

1981, c. 412, s. 2; 2009-381, s. 1.

§ 18B-1009.
In-stand sales.

Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to prohibit a retail permittee from selling for consumption, malt beverages in the seating areas of stadiums, ballparks, and other similar public places with a seating capacity of 3,000 or more during professional sporting events, provided that:

The seating areas are designated as part of the retail permittee’s licensed premises;

The retail permittee has notified the Commission, in writing, of its intent to sell malt beverages in the seating areas at sporting events;

Service of food and nonalcoholic beverages is available in the seating areas;

The retail permittee has certified to the Commission that it has trained its employees:

To identify underage persons and intoxicated persons; and

To refuse to sell malt beverages to those persons as required by

G.S. 18B-305

; and

The employees do not verbally shout or hawk the sale of malt beverages.

The North Carolina Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission shall adopt rules for the suspension of alcohol sales in the latter portion of professional sporting events in order to protect public safety at these events.

History.

1997-167, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2013-83, ss. 1, 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-83, s. 1, effective June 12, 2013, substituted “3,000 or more during professional sporting events” for “60,000 or more during professional sporting events, in municipalities with a population greater than 450,000, according to the most recent estimate of population made by the Office of State Budget and Management” in the first paragraph of subsection (a).

§ 18B-1010.
Sale and delivery of more than one drink at a time to a single patron.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the holder of an on-premises malt beverage permit, on-premises unfortified wine permit, on-premises fortified wine permit, or mixed beverages permit issued under

G.S. 18B-1001

may sell and deliver alcoholic beverage drinks to a single patron with the following limitations:

Not more than two alcoholic beverage drinks at one time if the alcoholic beverage drinks are any of the following:

A malt beverage.

Unfortified wine.

Fortified wine.

Not more than one alcoholic beverage at one time if an alcoholic beverage drink is a mixed beverage or contains spirituous liquor.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-150, s. 11.1(a), effective September 10, 2021, and applicable to the sale and delivery of alcoholic beverages on or after that date.

History.

2019-182, s. 13(a); 2021-150, s. 11.1(a).

§ 18B-1011.
Retail permittee off-site airport storage.

Permittees holding permits issued pursuant to

G.S. 18B-1001(1)

, (3), (5), and (10) for premises located within airport terminals may contract with an airport central storage permittee for storage at the airport central storage permittee’s licensed premises of the permittee’s alcoholic beverages to be sold at the retail permittee’s airport locations as authorized by the Commission. The permittee may contract with the airport central storage permittee to transport the retail permittee’s alcoholic beverages from the airport central storage facility to the retail permittee’s premises or support location.

The location where the retail permittee’s alcoholic beverages are stored on the airport central storage permittee’s premises shall be deemed an extension of the retail permittee’s licensed premises for purposes of this Chapter.

History.

2021-150, s. 19.4.

§§ 18B-1012 through 18B-1099.

Reserved for future codification purposes.